Utah statutes.
72-10-215.   Restrictions on use of airport revenue to finance a fixed guideway.

An airport operator may not use airport revenue to contribute to the cost of constructing, equipping, maintaining, or operating any portion of a fixed guideway as defined in Section 59-12-102.

